Virginia statutes. Title 46.2. Motor Vehicles.
Chapter 3.
Licensure of Drivers.

Article 18.

Driver License Compact.

46.2-483.Compact enacted into law; terms.

46.2-484.Department of Motor Vehicles to be "licensing authority" within meaning of compact; duties of Department.

46.2-485.Compensation and expenses of compact administrator.

46.2-486.Governor to be "executive head" within meaning of compact.

46.2-487.Statutes and ordinances deemed to cover offenses specified in subdivision (a) of Article IV of compact.

46.2-488.Question to be included in application for driver's license; surrender of license issued by another party state.